Indiana, session 2026, HB1306.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 12-10-17.1-12, AS AMENDED BY P.L.56-2023,
SECTION 93, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. (a) Subject to subsection (f), the division
shall register an individual who provides the following:
(1) A personal resume containing information concerning the
individual's qualifications, work experience, and any credentials
the individual may hold. The individual must certify that the
information contained in the resume is true and accurate.
(2) The individual's:
(A) limited criminal history check from the Indiana central
repository for criminal history information under IC 10-13-3;
(B) expanded criminal history check under IC 20-26-2-1.5; or
(C) criminal history check from another source allowed by
law.
(3) If applicable, the individual's state nurse aide registry report
from the Indiana department of health. This subdivision does not
require an individual to be a nurse aide.
2026 IN 1306—LS 6903/DI 148


(4) Three (3) letters of reference.
(5) A registration fee. The division shall establish the amount of
the registration fee.
(6) Proof that the individual is at least eighteen (18) years of age.
(7) Any other information required by the division.
(b) A registration is valid for two (2) years. A personal services
attendant may renew the personal services attendant's registration by
updating any information in the file that has changed and by paying the
fee required under subsection (a)(5). The limited criminal history check
and report required under subsection (a)(2) and (a)(3) must be updated
every two (2) years.
(c) The division and any organization designated under section 11
of this chapter shall maintain a file for each personal services attendant
that contains:
(1) comments related to the provision of attendant care services
submitted by an individual in need of self-directed in-home care
who has employed the personal services attendant; and
(2) the items described in subsection (a)(1) through (a)(4).
(d) Upon request, the division shall provide to an individual in need
of self-directed in-home care the following:
(1) Without charge, a list of personal services attendants who are
registered with the division and available within the requested
geographic area.
(2) A copy of the information of a specified personal services
attendant who is on file with the division under subsection (c).
The division may charge a fee for shipping, handling, and copying
expenses.
(e) The limited criminal history check requirement described in
subsection (a)(2) may be satisfied by fulfilling the components of an
expanded criminal history check under IC 20-26-2-1.5 and is subject
to the conditions described in IC 16-27-2-4(c).
(f) A person may not be registered under subsection (a) if the
person has any of the following convictions:
(1) A sex crime (IC 35-42-4).
(2) Exploitation of an endangered adult (IC 35-46-1-12).
(3) Failure to report battery, neglect, or exploitation of an
endangered adult (IC 35-46-1-13).
(4) Theft, conversion, or receiving stolen property (IC
35-43-4), if the conviction is a:
(A) felony conviction that occurred less than ten (10) years;
or
(B) misdemeanor conviction that occurred less than five (5)
2026 IN 1306—LS 6903/DI 148


years;
before the person's registration application date.
(5) Identity deception (IC 35-43-5-3.5), if the conviction is a:
(A) felony conviction that occurred less than ten (10) years;
or
(B) misdemeanor conviction that occurred less than five (5)
years;
before the person's registration application date.
(6) Fraud (IC 35-43-5-4), if the conviction is a:
(A) felony conviction that occurred less than ten (10) years;
or
(B) misdemeanor conviction that occurred less than five (5)
years;
before the person's registration application date.
(7) Murder (IC 35-42-1-1).
(8) Voluntary manslaughter (IC 35-42-1-3).
(9) Except as provided in this section, a crime of violence (as
defined in IC 35-50-1-2), if the person's conviction occurred
less than ten (10) years before the person's registration
application date.
(10) A battery offense under IC 35-42-2 within the previous
five (5) years.
(11) A felony offense relating to controlled substances within
the previous five (5) years.
(12) Neglect of a dependent under IC 35-46-1-4.
SECTION 2. IC 16-25-6-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.214-2013,
SECTION 16, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) A person may not own or operate a hospice
program if the person has:
(1) been convicted of rape (IC 35-42-4-1);
(2) been convicted of criminal deviate conduct (IC 35-42-4-2)
(repealed);
(3) been convicted of exploitation of a dependent or an
endangered adult (IC 35-46-1-12);
(4) had a judgment entered against the person for failure to report
battery, neglect, or exploitation of an endangered adult (IC
35-46-1-13); or
(5) been convicted of theft (IC 35-43-4), if the person's conviction
for theft occurred less than ten (10) years before the date of
submission by the person of an application for licensure or
approval as a hospice program under IC 16-25-3;
(6) been convicted of a battery offense under IC 35-42-2
2026 IN 1306—LS 6903/DI 148


within the previous five (5) years; or
(7) been convicted of neglect of a dependent under
IC 35-46-1-4.
(b) A person who knowingly or intentionally violates this section
commits a Class A misdemeanor.
SECTION 3. IC 16-25-6-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.214-2013,
SECTION 17, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), a
person who owns or operates a hospice program may not employ an
individual or allow a volunteer to provide hospice services if that
individual's or volunteer's limited criminal history indicates that the
individual or volunteer has:
(1) been convicted of rape (IC 35-42-4-1);
(2) been convicted of criminal deviate conduct (IC 35-42-4-2)
(repealed);
(3) been convicted of exploitation of an endangered adult (IC
35-46-1-12);
(4) had a judgment entered against the individual for failure to
report battery, neglect, or exploitation of an endangered adult (IC
35-46-1-13); or
(5) been convicted of theft (IC 35-43-4), if the conviction for theft
occurred less than ten (10) years before the individual's
employment application date;
(6) been convicted of a battery offense under IC 35-42-2
within the previous five (5) years; or
(7) been convicted of neglect of a dependent under
IC 35-46-1-4.
(b) A hospice program may not employ an individual or allow a
volunteer to provide hospice services for more than twenty-one (21)
calendar days without receipt of that individual's or volunteer's limited
criminal history required by section 2 of this chapter, unless the Indiana
central repository for criminal history information under IC 10-13-3 is
solely responsible for failing to provide the individual's or volunteer's
limited criminal history to the hospice program within the time
required under this subsection.
SECTION 4. IC 16-27-2-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.171-2025,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) Except as provided in subsection (c), a
person may not operate a home health agency or a personal services
agency if the person has been convicted of any of the following:
(1) A sex crime (IC 35-42-4).
(2) Exploitation of an endangered adult (IC 35-46-1-12).
2026 IN 1306—LS 6903/DI 148


(3) Failure to report battery, neglect, or exploitation of an
endangered adult (IC 35-46-1-13).
(4) Theft, conversion, or receiving stolen property (IC 35-43-4),
if the conviction is a:
(A) felony conviction that occurred less than ten (10) years; or
(B) misdemeanor conviction that occurred less than five (5)
years;
before the date of submission by the person of an application for
licensure as a home health agency under IC 16-27-1 or as a
personal services agency under IC 16-27-4.
(5) Identity deception (IC 35-43-5-3.5), if the conviction is a:
(A) felony conviction that occurred less than ten (10) years; or
(B) misdemeanor conviction that occurred less than five (5)
years;
before the person's employment application date.
(6) Fraud (IC 35-43-5-4), if the conviction is a:
(A) felony conviction that occurred less than ten (10) years; or
(B) misdemeanor conviction that occurred less than five (5)
years;
before the person's employment application date.
(7) Murder (IC 35-42-1-1).
(8) Voluntary manslaughter (IC 35-42-1-3).
(9) Except as provided in this section, a crime of violence (as
defined in IC 35-50-1-2), if the person's conviction occurred less
than ten (10) years before the person's employment application
date.
(10) Felony A battery offense under IC 35-42-2 within the
previous five (5) years.
(11) A felony offense relating to controlled substances within the
previous five (5) years.
(12) Neglect of a dependent under IC 35-46-1-4.
(b) A person who knowingly or intentionally violates this section
commits a Class A misdemeanor.
(c) A person who:
(1) was operating a home health agency or a personal services
agency before July 1, 2025; and
(2) has a misdemeanor conviction under subsection (a)(4)(B) or
(a)(5)(B);
may continue to operate the home health agency or personal services
agency.
SECTION 5. IC 16-27-2-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.171-2025,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
2026 IN 1306—LS 6903/DI 148


JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) Except as provided in subsections (c) and
(d), a person who operates a home health agency under IC 16-27-1 or
a personal services agency under IC 16-27-4 may not employ a person
to provide services in a patient's or client's temporary or permanent
residence if one (1) or more of the following conditions exist:
(1) The person's national criminal history background check or
expanded criminal history check indicates that the person has
been convicted of any of the following:
(A) A sex crime (IC 35-42-4).
(B) Exploitation of an endangered adult (IC 35-46-1-12).
(C) Failure to report battery, neglect, or exploitation of an
endangered adult (IC 35-46-1-13).
(D) Theft, conversion, or receiving stolen property (IC
35-43-4), if the conviction is a:
(i) felony conviction that occurred less than ten (10) years;
or
(ii) misdemeanor conviction that occurred less than five (5)
years;
before the person's employment application date.
(E) Identity deception (IC 35-43-5-3.5), if the conviction is a:
(i) felony conviction that occurred less than ten (10) years;
or
(ii) misdemeanor conviction that occurred less than five (5)
years;
before the person's employment application date.
(F) Fraud (IC 35-43-5-4), if the conviction is a:
(i) felony conviction that occurred less than ten (10) years;
or
(ii) misdemeanor conviction that occurred less than five (5)
years;
before the person's employment application date.
(G) Murder (IC 35-42-1-1).
(H) Voluntary manslaughter (IC 35-42-1-3).
(I) Except as provided in this section, a crime of violence (as
defined in IC 35-50-1-2), if the person's conviction occurred
less than ten (10) years before the person's employment
application date.
(J) Felony A battery offense under IC 35-42-2 within the
previous five (5) years.
(K) A felony offense relating to controlled substances within
the previous five (5) years.
(L) Neglect of a dependent under IC 35-46-1-4.
2026 IN 1306—LS 6903/DI 148


(2) The person:
(A) has abused, neglected, or mistreated a patient or
misappropriated a patient's property; and
(B) had a finding entered into the state nurse aide registry.
(b) A person who knowingly or intentionally applies for a job as a
home health aide or other unlicensed employee at:
(1) a home health agency;
(2) a health care facility; or
(3) an entity in the business of contracting to provide home health
aides or other unlicensed employees for a health care facility;
after a conviction of one (1) or more of the offenses listed in subsection
(a)(1) commits a Class A infraction.
(c) A home health agency or personal services agency may not
employ a person to provide services in a patient's or client's temporary
or permanent residence for more than twenty-one (21) calendar days
without receipt of that person's national criminal history background
check or expanded criminal history check required by section 4 of this
chapter, unless the state police department, the Federal Bureau of
Investigation under IC 10-13-3-39, or the private agency providing the
expanded criminal history check is responsible for failing to provide
the person's national criminal history background check or expanded
criminal history check to the home health agency or personal services
agency within the time required under this subsection.
(d) A home health agency or personal services agency may continue
to employ a person to provide services in a patient's or client's
temporary or permanent residence if the person:
(1) has a misdemeanor conviction under subsection (a)(1)(D)(ii)
or (a)(1)(E)(ii); and
(2) was employed by the home health agency or personal services
agency to provide services described in this subsection before
July 1, 2025.
2026 IN 1306—LS 6903/DI 148